Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.710

Definitions.

The following terms, whenever used or referred to in RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780, shall have the following meaning, excepting in those instances where the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) The word "board" means the board of regents of Washington State University.

(2) The words "building fees" mean the building fees charged students registering at the university, but shall not mean special tuition or other fees charged such students or fees, charges, rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue-producing lands, buildings, and facilities of the university, heretofore or hereafter acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land or the appurtenances thereon.

(3) The words "bond retirement fund" mean the special fund created by RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780, to be known as the Washington State University bond retirement fund.

(4) The word "bonds" means the bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

(5) The word "projects" means the construction, completion, reconstruction, remodeling, rehabilitation, or improvement of any building or other facility of the university authorized by the legislature at any time and to be financed by the issuance and sale of bonds.

[ 1985 c 390 s 42; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.710. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 12 s 2. Formerly RCW 28.80.510.]

NOTES:

Revenue bonds for construction of buildings and acquisition of facilities: RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330.